Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.255

Correction of rejected weights and measures.

(1) Weighing or measuring instruments or devices that have been rejected under the authority of the director or a city sealer shall remain subject to the control of the rejecting authority until such time as suitable repair or disposition thereof has been made as required by this section.

(2) The owner of any weighing or measuring instrument or device that has been marked or tagged as rejected by the director or a city sealer shall cause the same to be made correct within thirty days or such longer period as may be authorized by the rejecting authority. In lieu of correction, the owner of such weighing and measuring instrument or device may dispose of the same, but only in the manner specifically authorized by the rejecting authority.

(3) Weighing and measuring instruments or devices that have been rejected shall not again be used commercially until they have been reexamined and found to be correct by the department, city sealer, or a service agent registered with the department.

(4) If a weighing or measuring instrument or device marked or tagged as rejected is placed back into commercial service by a service agent registered with the department, the agent shall provide a signed certification to the owner or operator of the instrument or device so indicating and shall report to the rejecting authority as provided by rule under *RCW 19.94.190(1)(c).

[ 1995 c 355 s 12; 1992 c 237 s 17; 1991 sp.s. c 23 s 14; 1969 c 67 s 33. Formerly RCW 19.94.330.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 19.94.190 was amended by 2019 c 96 s 4, changing subsection (1)(c) to subsection (4)(c).

Application—Effective dates—1995 c 355: See notes following RCW 19.94.015.

Legislative findings—Intent—1991 sp.s. c 23: See notes following RCW 19.94.150.